Mississippi, session 2026, SB2799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-9-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-9-115.  (1)  A person commits the crime of tampering with a witness if he: (a)  Intentionally or knowingly attempts to induce a witness or a person he reasonably believes will be called as a witness in any official proceeding to: (i)  Testify falsely or unlawfully withhold testimony; (ii)  Absent himself from any official proceeding to which he has been legally summoned; or (b)  Solicits, encourages, threatens, harasses or intimidates or attempts to solicit, encourage, threaten, harass or intimidate a witness in an effort to prevent or dissuade the witness from testifying or to provide a false version of events exonerating or incriminating another person of commission of a crime. (2)  (a)  A person convicted of tampering with a witness * * * is a Class 2 shall be guilty of a felony and shall be fined in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the fine authorized in law for the subject offense or imprisoned for a term equal to fifty percent (50%) of the term of imprisonment authorized in law for the subject offense or by both such fine and imprisonment. (b)  Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the term of imprisonment authorized under this subsection shall not exceed a term of fifteen (15) years. (3)  It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section if the actual completion of the threat, harassment or intimidation was prevented from occurring. (4)  As used in this section, "subject offense" means either the offense at issue in the official proceeding under subsection (1)(a) of this section or the crime a person seeks exoneration from or incrimination of under subsection (1)(b) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.